Ohio, session 136, HB781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 5104.015, 5104.017, 5104.018, and 5104.019 be amended and section 5104.044 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5104.015. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the operation of child care centers, including parent cooperative centers, part-time centers, and drop-in centers. The rules shall reflect the various forms of child care and the needs of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care and shall include specific rules for school-age child care centers that are developed in consultation with the department of education and workforce. The rules shall include the following: (A) Submission of a site plan and descriptive plan of operation to demonstrate how the center proposes to meet the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter for the initial license application; (B) Standards for ensuring that the physical surroundings of the center are safe and sanitary including the physical environment, the physical plant, and the equipment of the center; (C) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the center; (D) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies, to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible. As used in this division, "program" does not include instruction in religious or moral doctrines, beliefs, or values that is conducted at child care centers owned and operated by churches and does include methods of disciplining children at child care centers. (E) Admissions policies and procedures; (F) Health care policies and procedures, including procedures for the isolation of children with communicable diseases; (G) First aid and emergency procedures; (H) Procedures for discipline and supervision of children; (I) Standards for the provision of nutritious meals and snacks; (J) Procedures for screening children that may include any necessary physical examinations and shall include immunizations in accordance with section 5104.014 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for screening employees that may include any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (L) Methods for encouraging parental participation in the center and methods for ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and employees are protected and that responsibilities of parents and employees are met; (M) Procedures for ensuring the safety and adequate supervision of children traveling off the premises of the center while under the care of a center employee; (N) Procedures for record keeping, organization, and administration; (O) Procedures for issuing, denying, and revoking a license that are not otherwise provided for in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (P) Inspection Subject to section 5104.044 of the Revised Code, inspection procedures; (Q) Procedures and standards for setting initial license application fees; (R) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints about centers; (S) Procedures for enforcing section 5104.04 of the Revised Code; (T) Minimum qualifications for employment as an administrator or child care staff member, which shall not include requiring an administrator or child care staff member to hold or obtain a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree; (U) Requirements for the training of administrators and child care staff members, including training in first aid, in prevention, recognition, and management of communicable diseases, and in child abuse recognition and prevention; (V) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who require treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the center; (W) A procedure for reporting of injuries of children that occur at the center; (X) Standards for licensing child care centers for children with short-term illnesses and other temporary medical conditions; (Y) Minimum requirements for instructional time for child care centers rated through the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code; (Z) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding child care centers. Sec. 5104.017. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the operation of type A family child care homes, including parent cooperative type A homes, part-time type A homes, and drop-in type A homes. The rules shall reflect the various forms of child care and the needs of children receiving child care. The rules shall include the following: (A) Submission of a site plan and descriptive plan of operation to demonstrate how the type A home proposes to meet the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter for the initial license application; (B) Standards for ensuring that the physical surroundings of the type A home are safe and sanitary, including the physical environment, the physical plant, and the equipment of the type A home; (C) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type A home; (D) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies, to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible; (E) Admissions policies and procedures; (F) Health care policies and procedures, including procedures for the isolation of children with communicable diseases; (G) First aid and emergency procedures; (H) Procedures for discipline and supervision of children; (I) Standards for the provision of nutritious meals and snacks; (J) Procedures for screening children, including any necessary physical examinations and the immunizations required pursuant to section 5104.014 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for screening employees, including any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (L) Methods for encouraging parental participation in the type A home and methods for ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and employees are protected and that the responsibilities of parents and employees are met; (M) Procedures for ensuring the safety and adequate supervision of children traveling off the premises of the type A home while under the care of a type A home employee; (N) Procedures for record keeping, organization, and administration; (O) Procedures for issuing, denying, and revoking a license that are not otherwise provided for in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (P) Inspection Subject to section 5104.044 of the Revised Code, inspection procedures; (Q) Procedures and standards for setting initial license application fees; (R) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints about type A homes; (S) Procedures for enforcing section 5104.04 of the Revised Code; (T) A standard requiring the inclusion of a current department of children and youth toll-free telephone number on each type A home license that any person may use to report a suspected violation by the type A home of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; (U) Requirements for the training of administrators and child care staff members in first aid, in prevention, recognition, and management of communicable diseases, and in child abuse recognition and prevention; (V) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who require treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type A home; (W) Standards for the maximum number of children per child care staff member; (X) Requirements for the amount of usable indoor floor space for each child; (Y) Requirements for safe outdoor play space; (Z) Qualifications and training requirements for administrators and for child care staff members, which shall not include requiring an administrator or child care staff member to hold or obtain a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree; (AA) Procedures for granting a parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian, or a custodian or guardian access to the type A home during its hours of operation; (BB) Minimum requirements for instructional time for type A homes rated through the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code; (CC) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding type A homes. Sec. 5104.018. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the licensure of type B family child care homes. The rules shall provide for safeguarding the health, safety, and welfare of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in a licensed type B family child care home and shall include all of the following: (A) Requirements for the type B home to notify parents with children in the type B home that the type B home is certified as a foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (B) Standards for ensuring that the type B home and the physical surroundings of the type B home are safe and sanitary, including physical environment, physical plant, and equipment; (C) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the home; (D) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible; (E) Admission policies and procedures; (F) Health care, first aid and emergency procedures; (G) Procedures for the care of sick children; (H) Procedures for discipline and supervision of children; (I) Nutritional standards; (J) Procedures for screening children, including any necessary physical examinations and the immunizations required pursuant to section 5104.014 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for screening administrators and employees, including any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (L) Methods of encouraging parental participation and ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and administrators are protected and the responsibilities of parents and administrators are met; (M) Standards for the safe transport of children when under the care of administrators; (N) Procedures for issuing, denying, or revoking licenses; (O) Procedures Subject to section 5104.044 of the Revised Code, procedures for the inspection of type B homes that require, at a minimum, that each type B home be inspected prior to licensure to ensure that the home is safe and sanitary; (P) Procedures for record keeping and evaluation; (Q) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints; (R) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who receive treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type B home; (S) Requirements for the amount of usable indoor floor space for each child; (T) Requirements for safe outdoor play space; (U) Qualification and training requirements for administrators and employees, which shall not include requiring an administrator or employee to hold or obtain a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree; (V) Procedures for granting a parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian, or a custodian or guardian access to the type B home during its hours of operation; (W) Requirements for the type B home to notify parents with children in the type B home that the type B home is certified as a foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (X) Minimum requirements for instructional time for type B homes rated through the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code; (Y) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding licensure of type B homes. Sec. 5104.019. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the certification of in-home aides. The rules shall provide for safeguarding the health, safety, and welfare of children receiving publicly funded child care in their own home and shall include the following: (A) Standards for ensuring that the child's home and the physical surroundings of the child's home are safe and sanitary, including physical environment, physical plant, and equipment; (B) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving publicly funded child care in their own home; (C) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible; (D) Health care, first aid, and emergency procedures, procedures for the care of sick children, procedures for discipline and supervision of children, nutritional standards, and procedures for screening children and in-home aides, including any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (E) Methods of encouraging parental participation and ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and in-home aides are protected and the responsibilities of parents and in-home aides are met; (F) Standards for the safe transport of children when under the care of in-home aides; (G) Procedures for issuing, renewing, denying, refusing to renew, or revoking certificates; (H) Procedures Subject to section 5104.044 of the Revised Code, procedures for inspection of homes of children receiving publicly funded child care in their own homes; (I) Procedures for record keeping and evaluation; (J) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints; (K) Qualifications and training requirements for in-home aides; (L) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who receive treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving publicly funded child care in the child's own home; (M) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding certification of in-home aides. Sec. 5104.044. In establishing procedures for inspecting child care centers, type A family child care homes, licensed type B family child care homes, and the homes of children receiving publicly funded child care in their own homes, all of the following apply: (A) The director of job and family services shall assist the director of children and youth in establishing inspection procedures. (B) In an effort to establish consistent and uniform inspection procedures, including for inspections conducted by county departments of job and family services, the directors shall jointly establish procedures that, where possible, apply uniformly across the settings in which child care may be provided in any county of this state. (C) The directors shall jointly train individuals charged with conducting inspections under this chapter. Section 2. That existing sections 5104.015, 5104.017, 5104.018, and 5104.019 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Section 5104.019 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly and H.B. 281 of the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.